Maryland, session 2026, HB0583.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
26–102.
This title applies only in Prince George’s County.
26–1311.
(a) When the Board issues a Class C per diem beer, wine, and liquor license, the
Board shall provide notice of the event for which the license is issued to:
(1) the County Police Chief;
(2) the County Fire Chief;
– 1 –

Ch. 837 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) the director of the [County Department of Environmental Resources]
DEPARTMENT OF PERMITTING, INSPECTIONS, AND ENFORCEMENT; and
(4) if applicable, the chief administrative officer of the municipality in
which the event is to be held.
(b) The notice shall include the time, place, and expected size of the event.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 2 –